test/src/gt-desc-yamls/transitivevi_gt-desc.ana.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Verb - transitive verb - ok : # Test for intransitive verb inflection vowel initial
    #Present Tense

    # Obj. = 1st person singular vowel initial
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Sg1+SetA.Sg2: nikinaawab'i # me escuchas
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Sg1+SetA.Sg3: nikinrab'i # me escucha él
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Sg1+SetA.Pl2: nikineerab'i # me escuchan ustedes
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Sg1+SetA.Pl3: nikine'rab'i # me escuchan ellos

    # Obj. = 1st person plural vowel initial
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Pl1+SetA.Sg2: nokohaawab'i # nos escuchas
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Pl1+SetA.Sg3: nokorab'i # nos escucha él
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Pl1+SetA.Pl2: nokoheerab'i # nos escuchan ustedes
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Pl1+SetA.Pl3: nokohe'rab'i # nos escuchan ellos

    # Obj. = 2nd person singular vowel initial
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Sg2+SetA.Sg1: nakatwab'i # te escucho
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Sg2+SetA.Sg3: nakatrab'i # él te escucha
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Sg2+SetA.Pl1: nakatqab'i # te escuchamos
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Sg2+SetA.Pl3: nakate'rab'i # ellos te escuchan

    # Obj = 2nd person plural vowel initial
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Pl2+SetA.Sg1: nekexwab'i # les escucho a ustedes
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Pl2+SetA.Sg3: nekexrab'i # él les escucha a ustedes
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Pl2+SetA.Pl1: nekexqab'i # les escuchamos a ustedes
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Pl2+SetA.Pl3: nekexrab'iheb' # ellos les escuchan a ustedes

    # Obj = 3rd persion singular vowel initial
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Sg3+SetA.Sg1: nawab'i # lo escucho
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Sg3+SetA.Sg2: nakawab'i # lo escuchas
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Sg3+SetA.Sg3: narab'i # lo escucha él
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Sg3+SetA.Pl1: naqab'i # lo escuchamos
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Sg3+SetA.Pl2: nekerab'i # lo escuchan ustedes
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Sg3+SetA.Pl3: neke'rab'i # lo escuchan ellos

    # Obj. = 3rd person plural vowell initial
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Pl3+SetA.Sg1: neke'wab'i # los escucho
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Pl3+SetA.Sg1: nawab'iheb' # los escucho 
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Pl3+SetA.Sg2: nakawab'iheb' # los escuchas 
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Pl3+SetA.Sg3: narab'iheb' # él los escucha
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Pl3+SetA.Pl1: neke'qab'i # los escuchamos
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Pl3+SetA.Pl1: naqab'iheb' # los escuchamos
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Pl3+SetA.Pl2: nekerab'iheb' # los escuchan ustedes 
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Pl3+SetA.Pl3: neke'rab'iheb' # los escuchan ellos 

    
